Maryland, session 2025, HB1285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–215.
(a) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 9–305 OF THIS TITLE, THE Mayor and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1285*

HOUSE BILL 1285
City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of a county may grant, by law, a local
supplement to the Homeowners Property Tax Credit Program provided under § 9–104 of
this title.
9–305.
(J) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “COMBINED INCOME” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–104
OF THIS TITLE.
(III) “DWELLING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–104 OF THIS
TITLE.
(IV) “HOMEOWNER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–104 OF
THIS TITLE.
(V) “NET WORTH” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–104 OF
THIS TITLE.
(VI) “TOTAL REAL PROPERTY TAX” MEANS THE SUM OF ALL
PROPERTY TAX RATES ON REAL PROPERTY FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR ON A DWELLING,
MULTIPLIED BY THE LESSER OF:
1. $300,000; OR
2. THE ASSESSED VALUE OF THE DWELLING REDUCED
BY THE AMOUNT OF ANY ASSESSMENT ON WHICH A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT IS
GRANTED UNDER § 11–2–103 OF THE BALTIMORE COUNTY CODE.
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OF BALTIMORE COUNTY SHALL GRANT A
PROPERTY TAX CREDIT TO SUPPLEMENT THE HOMEOWNERS PROPERTY TAX CREDIT
GRANTED UNDER § 9–104 OF THIS TITLE.
(3) (I) THE PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IS
THE TOTAL REAL PROPERTY TAX OF A DWELLING, LESS THE PERCENTAGE OF THE
COMBINED INCOME OF THE HOMEOWNER THAT IS DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH
(II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(II) THE PERCENTAGES ARE:
1. 0% OF THE FIRST $18,000 OF COMBINED INCOME;

HOUSE BILL 1285 3
2. 6.5% OF THE NEXT $4,000 OF COMBINED INCOME;
AND
3. 9% OF COMBINED INCOME OVER $22,000.
(4) A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE
GRANTED:
(I) IF THE HOMEOWNER’S COMBINED NET WORTH EXCEEDS
$200,000 AS OF DECEMBER 31 OF THE CALENDAR YEAR THAT IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDES THE YEAR IN WHICH THE HOMEOWNER APPLIES FOR THE PROPERTY TAX
CREDIT OR IF THE HOMEOWNER’S COMBINED GROSS INCOME EXCEEDS $72,000 IN
THAT SAME CALENDAR YEAR; OR
(II) IF THE HOMEOWNERS PROPERTY TAX CREDIT GRANTED
UNDER § 9–104 OF THIS TITLE EXCEEDS THE AMOUNT CALCULATED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(5) (I) THE DEPARTMENT IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE
ADMINISTRATIVE DUTIES THAT RELATE TO THE APPLICATION AND DETERMINATION
OF ELIGIBILITY FOR A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) THE COUNTY SHALL REIMBURSE THE DEPARTMENT FOR
THE REASONABLE COST OF ADMINISTERING THE PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.